public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ar é/FN [bou]rogar
SFX A ar é/FN [bp]erlar
SFX A ar é/FN [btv]ergar
SFX A ar é/FN [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar é/FN [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar é/FN [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar é/FN [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar é/FN [dg]obar
SFX A ar é/FN [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar é/FN [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar é/FN [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar é/FN [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar é/FN [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar é/FN [eilox]mar
SFX A ar é/FN [einoru]xar
SFX A ar é/FN [einosu]car
SFX A ar é/FN [eio]ndar
SFX A ar é/FN [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar é/FN [eo]liđar
SFX A ar é/FN [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar é/FN [es]kotar
SFX A ar é/FN [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar é/FN [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar é/FN [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar é/FN [fm]eretar
SFX A ar é/FN [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar é/FN [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar é/FN [gin]ritar
SFX A ar é/FN [iln]trar
SFX A ar é/FN [inru]jar
SFX A ar é/FN [io]ntar
SFX A ar é/FN [io]rkolar
SFX A ar é/FN [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar é/FN [ipu]lar
SFX A ar é/FN [irst]umar
SFX A ar é/FN [klt]ivar
SFX A ar é/FN [kp]avejar
SFX A ar é/FN [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar é/FN [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A ar é/FN [ln]etrar
SFX A ar é/FN [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar é/FN [mp]eritar
SFX A ar é/FN [mpux]andar
SFX A ar é/FN [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar é/FN [ns]erbar
SFX A ar é/FN [ns]ervar
SFX A ar é/FN [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar é/FN [nsv]edar
SFX A ar é/FN [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar é/FN [op]ar
SFX A ar é/FN [ox]longar
SFX A ar é/FN [pt]resar
SFX A ar é/FN [pt]rotar
SFX A ar é/FN [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar é/FN [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar é/FN [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar é/FN [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar é/FN [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar é/FN [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar é/FN ^alienar
SFX A ar é/FN ^bersajar
SFX A ar é/FN ^bordeđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^deramar
SFX A ar é/FN ^derivar
SFX A ar é/FN ^derobar
SFX A ar é/FN ^derokar
SFX A ar é/FN ^derotar
SFX A ar é/FN ^desferenŧiar
SFX A ar é/FN ^devorar
SFX A ar é/FN ^devorŧiar
SFX A ar é/FN ^dexeredar
SFX A ar é/FN ^dexverxenar
SFX A ar é/FN ^exerŧitar
SFX A ar é/FN ^fermentar
SFX A ar é/FN ^griliar
SFX A ar é/FN ^guernar
SFX A ar é/FN ^inbaretar
SFX A ar é/FN ^infervorar
SFX A ar é/FN ^inkartonar
SFX A ar é/FN ^intarsiar
SFX A ar é/FN ^interesar
SFX A ar é/FN ^interkalar
SFX A ar é/FN ^interkuerar
SFX A ar é/FN ^interkuirar
SFX A ar é/FN ^interlinear
SFX A ar é/FN ^intermeđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^interogar
SFX A ar é/FN ^interpretar
SFX A ar é/FN ^inveriar
SFX A ar é/FN ^inversiar
SFX A ar é/FN ^inŧercelar
SFX A ar é/FN ^kalefar
SFX A ar é/FN ^kriolar
SFX A ar é/FN ^lustrar
SFX A ar é/FN ^maravejar
SFX A ar é/FN ^merkantar
SFX A ar é/FN ^merkantiđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^ormeđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perfumar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perifraxar
SFX A ar é/FN ^periodar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perkolar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perkotar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perlustrar
SFX A ar é/FN ^permudarar
SFX A ar é/FN ^permutar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perorar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perpetrar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perpetuar
SFX A ar é/FN ^perseguitar
SFX A ar é/FN ^personaliđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^persugar
SFX A ar é/FN ^raxar
SFX A ar é/FN ^robar
SFX A ar é/FN ^roersar
SFX A ar é/FN ^sajar
SFX A ar é/FN ^scantiđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^skortegar
SFX A ar é/FN ^sotolinear
SFX A ar é/FN ^soverkiar
SFX A ar é/FN ^spergoŧar
SFX A ar é/FN ^sperimentar
SFX A ar é/FN ^sperlongar
SFX A ar é/FN ^spernacar
SFX A ar é/FN ^sperđurar
SFX A ar é/FN ^steriliđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^terapienar
SFX A ar é/FN ^teraŧar
SFX A ar é/FN ^termenar
SFX A ar é/FN ^terŧariolar
SFX A ar é/FN ^tormentar
SFX A ar é/FN ^verdeđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^vergiđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^verifegar
SFX A ar é/FN ^verolar
SFX A ar é/FN ^verxurar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xberlefar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xberlotar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xberlumar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xberxelar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xermojar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xgoñar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xlargiđar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xmerejar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xmeriliar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xmerŧiar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xmorgolar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xnervađar
SFX A ar é/FN ^xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar é/FN alar
SFX A ar é/FN amar
SFX A ar é/FN andar
SFX A ar é/FN arar
SFX A ar é/FN bertonar
SFX A ar é/FN dar
SFX A ar é/FN derenar
SFX A ar é/FN donar
SFX A ar é/FN far
SFX A ar é/FN fumar
SFX A ar é/FN kalar
SFX A ar é/FN kantar
SFX A ar é/FN kolar
SFX A ar é/FN korniđar
SFX A ar é/FN kurvar
SFX A ar é/FN lotar
SFX A ar é/FN lumar
SFX A ar é/FN menar
SFX A ar é/FN meravejar
SFX A ar é/FN međar
SFX A ar é/FN mojar
SFX A ar é/FN mudarar
SFX A ar é/FN ojar
SFX A ar é/FN okar
SFX A ar é/FN perdonar
SFX A ar é/FN perletar
SFX A ar é/FN pertegar
SFX A ar é/FN pongar
SFX A ar é/FN rajar
SFX A ar é/FN ramar
SFX A ar é/FN redar
SFX A ar é/FN rigolar
SFX A ar é/FN rivar
SFX A ar é/FN rolar
SFX A ar é/FN seguitar
SFX A ar é/FN serajar
SFX A ar é/FN siar
SFX A ar é/FN speronar
SFX A ar é/FN sugar
SFX A ar é/FN terminar
SFX A ar é/FN tonar
SFX A ar é/FN tuar
SFX A ar é/FN vejar
SFX A ar é/FN velar
SFX A ar é/FN vergoñar
SFX A ar é/FN verigolar
SFX A ar é/FN versar
SFX A ar é/FN verđelar
SFX A ar é/FN xelar
SFX A ar é/FN xmerdar
SFX A ar é/FN đurar
SFX A ar é/FN ŧercar
SFX A ar é/FN ŧitar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abik]rokar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [abikoptu]riar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeio]strar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aelo]var
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeo]liar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [agot]rejar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ai]erar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ail]gar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ailu]minar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aisu]kiar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [als]tar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [an]deđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [an]fraxar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [an]kuerar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [an]kuirar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ano]fegar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ao]niđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ao]rcar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ao]rdar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ao]rkar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ao]rnar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ao]rsar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aou]nŧiar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aou]rbar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aou]rgar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aou]rkiar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aou]rlar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aou]rtar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [aux]nar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bdfjmnptvx]iar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bou]rogar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bp]erlar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [btv]ergar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [dg]obar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [eilox]mar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [einoru]xar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [einosu]car
SFX A ar éa/HNP [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [eo]liđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [es]kotar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar éa/HNP [fm]eretar
