public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
aidar/A
dexalborar/A
inalŧar/A
traxandar/A
ansinar/A
inarđerar/A
inarpeđar/A
astiar/A
inaŧidir/A
reaver/A
badar/A
bagolar/A
xbakanar/A
xbalanŧar/A
balordir/A
rexbalŧar/A
abandonar/A
inbaoxar/A
xbarbar/A
dexbarkar/A
rebasar/A
rebàter/A
baŧilar/A
xbavar/A
bear/A
xbekotar/A
xberlumar/A
béver/A
inbiankar/A
inbiavar/A
inkonbinar/A
dexbirar/A
biskotar/A
xboar/A
sobóɉer/A
bokiđar/A
inbolsir/A
bonbar/A
dexbonigolar/A
bordiđar/A
inboskar/A
dexbotonar/A
inboxemar/A
xbragesar/A
xbranar/A
xbratar/A
xbrenar/A
brilantar/A
xbrodacar/A
inbroketar/A
brontolar/A
brusketar/A
rabufar/A
buskar/A
inbuŧolar/A
buxnar/A
carir/A
incavetar/A
ascèñer/A
acéñer/A
tracéñer/A
cikar/A
scokar/A
benedir/A
damaskar/A
debutar/A
dentelar/A
determinar/A
dialogar/A
dexdíxer/A
docar/A
indolŧir/A
kondonar/A
dorar/A
adosar/A
indreŧar/A
indurir/A
inđalir/A
đogatar/A
rađónxer/A
đurar/A
efetuar/A
ensir/A
esir/A
exaɉerar/A
exerŧitar/A
konfar/A
tumefar/A
faelar/A
sfalkar/A
sfamar/A
faoređar/A
fataliđar/A
infaŧolar/A
fortifegar/A
ratifegar/A
efeltrir/A
fenestrar/A
inferir/A
deskonfermar/A
sfetar/A
desfiamar/A
infiapir/A
afidar/A
desfigurar/A
trafilar/A
finir/A
sfiorar/A
prefisar/A
desfitar/A
konfluir/A
desfogar/A
sfoɉar/A
konfónder/A
sforbeđar/A
trasformar/A
desfornir/A
refosar/A
franar/A
sfrànđer/A
fratar/A
fraŧionar/A
desfregolar/A
desfríđer/A
sfrixar/A
frular/A
trafugar/A
perfumar/A
furegar/A
refuxir/A
galar/A
dexgalonar/A
xganasar/A
inganŧar/A
ingarbelar/A
xgargariđar/A
dexgateɉar/A
gendoliđar/A
ingloriar/A
gomitar/A
xgorbar/A
degradar/A
ingramir/A
grandenar/A
granpar/A
kongratular/A
xgravar/A
gremir/A
dexgreŧiar/A
griñar/A
xgriŧolar/A
dexgropar/A
gruñar/A
inguɉar/A
guarentar/A
guidar/A
dexgustar/A
deidratar/A
indovinar/A
infornar/A
inpaxar/A
inraukir/A
interiŧir/A
intrivelar/A
istansiar/A
jaŧar/A
ɉaŧar/A
inɉemarar/A
ɉostrar/A
dexɉustar/A
deskàder/A
inkagar/A
interkalar/A
inkalkar/A
inkalorir/A
skalŧar/A
inkamuŧar/A
skanelar/A
kanforar/A
dekanpar/A
inkantexemar/A
kapar/A
dekapitar/A
deskapriŧiar/A
inkaratar/A
deskargar/A
karnevalar/A
kartar/A
deskartoŧar/A
skasegar/A
katar/A
inkatejar/A
inkatorigolar/A
kautar/A
kavalar/A
akaxar/A
deskodegar/A
deskokonar/A
inkolpar/A
skomunegar/A
inkonkolar/A
kontar/A
konvojar/A
rekórer/A
inkorđar/A
kortiđar/A
skovar/A
rekréser/A
krolar/A
kuadrar/A
interkuerar/A
inkukar/A
inkurar/A
lakoniđar/A
xlapar/A
inlaŧar/A
xlekiñar/A
alevar/A
xlipegar/A
lisar/A
dexlojar/A
luamar/A
tralúxer/A
xmaɉar/A
dimandar/A
mantegar/A
mareɉar/A
masar/A
inmatir/A
maxegar/A
inmelar/A
xmenuŧar/A
dexméter/A
mexurar/A
amirar/A
xmokar/A
xmonar/A
morbar/A
mormorar/A
remòver/A
inmular/A
inmutir/A
renàser/A
xnegriđar/A
nodar/A
xnuar/A
oblegar/A
preokupar/A
onɉar/A
orđar/A
osixenar/A
padir/A
paiŧar/A
palpiñar/A
spanpanar/A
konparir/A
despartir/A
strapasar/A
konpatir/A
spaŧientar/A
spegaŧar/A
penar/A
penetrar/A
repeonar/A
perpetrar/A
peteđolar/A
inpeŧolatar/A
piatolar/A
spikar/A
pionbinar/A
pistoletar/A
aplaudir/A
polsar/A
espóner/A
spongar/A
spónxer/A
sportelar/A
potenŧiar/A
reprénder/A
inpriar/A
aprovar/A
spurgar/A
radegar/A
ranbar/A
raportar/A
recolar/A
rengar/A
xridakiar/A
robar/A
inrokir/A
roñir/A
rubregar/A
ruskar/A
skonsagrar/A
saleđar/A
insangonar/A
saŧiar/A
scopiđar/A
segatar/A
asegurar/A
semolar/A
aseñar/A
konservar/A
sfrutar/A
simolar/A
sixilar/A
skarabotar/A
iskeletrar/A
skoinar/A
deskríver/A
sofrir/A
solŧar/A
asòrber/A
spanir/A
spendacar/A
inspeŧionar/A
traspirar/A
spronar/A
destafar/A
stanŧiar/A
sterŧar/A
restituir/A
storpiar/A
astrénđer/A
stroŧar/A
instukar/A
suefar/A
suplantar/A
detajar/A
takiđar/A
tapeŧar/A
tartufolar/A
tecar/A
strainténder/A
ostentar/A
reteñir/A
astéñer/A
termenar/A
texorar/A
intitolar/A
stondar/A
intorkolar/A
tosir/A
trabatar/A
tranxar/A
destraviar/A
treskar/A
trivelar/A
trupar/A
inŧakolar/A
ŧefar/A
ŧerkar/A
inŧíder/A
antiŧipar/A
ŧotar/A
urmar/A
invagir/A
xvanpolar/A
vedar/A
velar/A
inventar/A
perveñir/A
rinvèñer/A
inverigolar/A
sovèrter/A
deviar/A
vínŧer/A
revíver/A
vokaliđar/A
vòlxer/A
inxaltrar/A
xbravar/A
inxerir/A
xlapañar/A
xudegar/A
